Florida, session 2026, HB563.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Mac Parkman and
Ray Lewis III Act."
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb563-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 563 2026
Section 2. Section 381.996, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
381.996 Repetitive head impact prevention.—
(1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Repetitive head impacts are inherent in high-risk
sports and are the root cause of chronic traumatic
encephalopathy.
(b) Youth under 18 years of age are especially vulnerable
due to ongoing brain development.
(c) Families, coaches, and even medical professionals
often lack information and training on repetitive head impacts
and chronic traumatic encephalopathy.
(d) Education, awareness, and informed consent are
necessary to protect children, reduce health and social costs,
and honor the memories of Mac Parkman and Ray Lewis III.
(2) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Brain-safe sports" means sports that minimize the
risk of head injuries, including, but not limited to,
concussions and long-term brain damage such as chronic traumatic
encephalopathy. The term includes basketball, baseball,
volleyball, track, swimming, and tennis.
(b) "Department" means the Department of Health.
(c) "High-risk sports" means a sport in which a player is
routinely subject to repetitive head impacts and includes
football, soccer, hockey, boxing, lacrosse, wrestling, rugby,
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb563-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 563 2026
cheerleading.
(d) "Repetitive head impacts" means subconcussive or
concussive impacts to the brain that accumulate over time
regardless of immediate symptoms.
(3) Beginning with the 2026–2027 school year, a parent or
legal guardian registering a child in a high-risk sport shall
receive standardized educational materials on repetitive head
impacts and chronic traumatic encephalopathy.
(a) The parent or legal guardian must sign and return an
acknowledgment form before the child participates in a high-risk
sport.
(b) The department, in consultation with the Department of
Education and the Florida High School Athletic Association,
shall develop and annually update the materials.
(c) The materials must explain the science of repetitive
head impacts and chronic traumatic encephalopathy, risks
associated with early participation, signs and symptoms of brain
injury and related mental illness, and safer alternatives of
brain-safe sports.
(4)(a) Athletic directors, coaches, referees, and trainers
of high-risk sports at the youth and high school levels must
annually complete mandatory repetitive head impacts and chronic
traumatic encephalopathy awareness training approved by the
department.
(b) The State Surgeon General shall collaborate with
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb563-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 563 2026
nonprofit organizations, state universities, and medical experts
to develop continuing education courses for physicians, nurses,
physician assistants, psychiatrists, psychologists, coroners,
suicide-prevention specialists, athletic trainers, coaches, and
youth sports officials.
(5)(a) There is established within the department the
Florida Brain Health in Sports Panel, an advisory council as
defined in s. 20.03(7), is created within the Department of
Health. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the panel
shall comply with the requirements of s. 20.052. The department,
in consultation with the Department of Education and the Florida
High School Athletic Association, shall appoint members of the
panel, which shall be composed of scientists, medical
professionals, educators, researchers, nonprofit leaders, and
stakeholders.
(b) By January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the panel
shall provide a report to the Legislature on panel progress,
findings, and policy recommendations. The report shall include
recommendations on parental education content and training
requirements and strategies to reduce repetitive head impact
exposure.
(6) The department may:
(a) Use funds appropriated for the development and
distribution of informed consent materials, the administration
100 of training and awareness programs, and to support the panel.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb563-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 563 2026
101 (b) Enter into public-private partnerships with
102 nonprofits, foundations, and universities to reduce departmental
103 costs and expand awareness.
104 (7) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement
105 this section.
106 Section 3. Section 683.339, Florida Statutes, is created
107 to read:
108 683.339 Repeated Head Injury Awareness Day.—September 24
109 of each year, during National Concussion Awareness Month, is
110 designated as "Parkman-Lewis Day."
111 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb563-00